ext/liblouis/tables/translation/_translation_de-DE-g2.ctb
# = de-de-g2.ctb without inclusion of de-de-g0.utb



letsign 6

# All exception rules which use the letter "ﬂ" are added BEFORE
# de-g2-core is included
always raufuﬂ 1235-16-124-136-6-2346
always rauf¸ﬂ 1235-16-124-1256-6-2346
always beruﬂ 23-1235-136-6-2346
always beiﬂ 12-146-6-2346
always beimaﬂ 2-12-134-1-6-2346
always demgem‰ﬂ 2-12356-12346-134-345-6-2346
word auﬂerdem 16-6-2346-12456-2-12356
midendword emaﬂ 15-134-1-6-2346
midendword em‰ﬂig 15-134-345-6-2346-45
always muﬂestund 134-136-6-2346-15-23456-256-145
always muﬂest¸nd 134-136-6-2346-15-23456-1256-1345-145
always m‰des¸ﬂ 134-345-145-15-234-1256-6-2346
begmidword auﬂengel‰nd 16-6-2346-14-12346-123-345-1345-145
always genieﬂ 12346-1345-346-6-2346
always genuﬂ 12346-1345-136-6-2346
always steingeiﬂ 23456-1246-1245-146-6-2346
always habergeiﬂ 125-1-12-12456-1245-146-6-2346
always herreiﬂ 125-12456-1235-146-6-2346
midendword ﬂion 6-2346-245
midendword ﬂions 6-2346-245-234
always m¸ﬂig 134-1256-6-2346-45
always ﬂ 6-2346
syllable stˆﬂ 23456-246-6-2346
midendword sspaﬂ 234-234-1234-1-6-2346
midendword sstoﬂ 234-23456-135-6-2346
midendword sstraﬂ 234-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always jakobstraﬂ 245-1-13-135-12-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always einfallstraﬂ 1246-124-12345-23456-1235-1-6-2346
begmidword karlstraﬂ 13-356-123-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always fahrtstraﬂ 2-1235-2345-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always fahrtstr‰ﬂ 2-1235-2345-23456-1235-345-6-2346
always begr¸ﬂungstrunk 23-1245-1235-1256-6-2346-136-234-2345-1235-256-13
always beiﬂt 12-146-6-2346-2345

include de-g2-core.ctb
